Idaho, session 2026, H0576.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-1608E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-1608E. SUBMISSION OF CLAIMS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
this section, whenever any person an Idaho resident or a person who was an
Idaho resident at the time of purchase is awarded a final judgment certified
in a court of competent jurisdiction in the state of Idaho for:
(a) Any actual loss or damage in connection with the purchase or lease
of a motor vehicle by reason of any fraud practiced on him or fraudulent
representation made to him by a licensed motor vehicle dealer; or
(b) Any actual loss or damage by reason of a violation by a dealer of any
of the provisions of chapter 6, title 48, Idaho Code, chapter 5, title
49, Idaho Code, or section 49-1418, Idaho Code, in connection with the
purchase or lease of a motor vehicle on or after July 1, 2014,;
the judgment creditor may file a verified claim with the board requesting
payment from the fund of the amount unpaid on the judgment.
(2) Verified claims filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be subject to the following conditions:
(i) (a) Unless the judgment has been appealed, the claim shall be filed
with the department, acting on behalf of the board, no sooner than
forty-five (45) days and no later than one (1) year after the judgment
becomes final.
(ii) (b) The board shall not consider claims submitted by motor vehicle
dealers, financial institutions or institutions providing floorplans
for motor vehicle dealers.
(2) (3) To For a person to be eligible to receive any payment from the
fund, any such person must be an Idaho resident or an Idaho resident at the
time of the purchase of the motor vehicle. Any action instituted by a person
against a licensee that may become a claim against the fund shall be served to
the board in a manner consistent with the provisions of section 48-613, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.